Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3876
(UTC 811) Enforcement and defense of claims.

(UTC 811) A trustee shall take reasonable steps to enforce claims of the trust and to defend claims against the trust.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 76.